Utah statutes.
70A-9a-333.   Priority of certain liens arising by operation of law.
(1)  In this section, "possessory lien" means an interest, other than a
security interest or an agricultural lien:
(a)  which secures payment or performance of an obligation for services or
materials furnished with respect to goods by a person in the ordinary course
of the person's business;
(b)  which is created by statute or rule of law in favor of the person; and
(c)  whose effectiveness depends on the person's possession of the goods.
(2)  A possessory lien on goods has priority over a security interest in the
goods unless the lien is created by a statute that expressly provides
otherwise.
